Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1209
Failure of defendant to move for discharge prior to trial or entry of plea; effect.

Failure of the defendant to move for discharge prior to trial or entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere shall constitute a waiver of the right to speedy trial.

Laws 1971, LB 436, § 5.

A defendant waives any objection on the basis of a violation of the right to a speedy trial when he or she does not file a motion to discharge before trial begins. State v. Dockery, 273 Neb. 330, 729 N.W.2d 320 (2007).

It is incumbent upon defendant and his counsel to file a timely motion for discharge in order to avoid the waiver provided for by this section. State v. Kearns, 245 Neb. 728, 514 N.W.2d 844 (1994).

As long as a defendant was properly advised of his rights, by either counsel or the court, by knowingly, intelligently, and voluntarily pleading guilty, the defendant waives his statutory right to a speedy trial. State v. McNitt, 216 Neb. 837, 346 N.W.2d 259 (1984).

It was not the duty of the trial court to suggest to the defendant or his counsel that he file a motion for discharge. State v. Hert, 192 Neb. 751, 224 N.W.2d 188 (1974).

A writ of habeas corpus would not issue to permit collateral attack on a sentence for first degree sexual assault and first degree false imprisonment based on an alleged speedy trial violation that the prisoner waived by failing to file a motion for discharge. Jones v. Nebraska Dept. of Corr. Servs., 21 Neb. App. 206, 838 N.W.2d 51 (2013).